Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 23 Uniform Interstate Family Support Act [Repealed.]

15-23-1 — 15-23-53.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 7; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 7; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 7; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 7; Repealed by P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 14, effective July 3, 1997. For present comparable provisions, see §

15-23.1-101

et seq.